test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-marangyTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - мараӈка: # Noun 'cloudberry /(fin) suomuurain' - partial paradigm /Type 15 a→i/
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom: мараӈга
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc: мараӈгамʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen: мараӈгаʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat: мараӈганʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc: мараӈгахана
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl: мараӈгахад
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros: мараӈгавна
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom: мараӈгахаʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc: мараӈгахаʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen: мараӈгахаʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom: мараӈгаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc: мараӈгы
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen: мараӈгыˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat: мараӈгахаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc: мараӈгахаˮна
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl: мараӈгахат
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros: мараӈгыˮмна
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [мараӈгав, мараӈгами]
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [мараӈгав, мараӈгами]
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [мараӈган, мараӈгани]
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [мараӈгахан, мараӈгахани]
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [мараӈгаханан, мараӈгаханани]
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [мараӈгахадан, мараӈгахадани]
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [мараӈгавнан, мараӈгавнани]
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [мараӈгахаюн, мараӈгахаюни]
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [мараӈгахаюн, мараӈгахаюни]
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [мараӈгахаюн, мараӈгахаюни]
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [мараӈгын, мараӈгыни]
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [мараӈгын, мараӈгыни]
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [мараӈгыˮн, мараӈгыˮни]
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [мараӈгахаˮн, мараӈгахаˮни]
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [мараӈгахаˮнан, мараӈгахаˮнани]
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [мараӈгахатан, мараӈгахатани]
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [мараӈгыˮмнан, мараӈгыˮмнани]
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: мараӈгар
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: мараӈгамд
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: мараӈганд
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: мараӈгаханд
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: мараӈгахананд
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: мараӈгахаданд
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: мараӈгавнанд
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: мараӈгахаюд
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: мараӈгахаюд
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: мараӈгахают
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: мараӈгыд
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: мараӈгыд
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: мараӈгыт
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: мараӈгахат
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: мараӈгахаˮнат
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: мараӈгахатат
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: мараӈгыˮмнат
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: мараӈгада
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: мараӈгамда
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: мараӈганда
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: мараӈгаханда
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: мараӈгахананда
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: мараӈгахаданда
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: мараӈгавнанда
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: мараӈгахаюда
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: мараӈгахаюда
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: мараӈгахаюта
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: мараӈгыда
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: мараӈгыда
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: мараӈгыта
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: мараӈгахата
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: мараӈгахаˮната
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: мараӈгахатата
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: мараӈгыˮмната
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: мараӈгамиʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: мараӈгами
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: мараӈгамиʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: мараӈгами
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: мараӈганиʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: мараӈгани
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: мараӈгаханиʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: мараӈгахани
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: мараӈгахананиʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: мараӈгаханани
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: мараӈгахаданиʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: мараӈгахадани
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: мараӈгавнаниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: мараӈгавнани
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: мараӈгахаюниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: мараӈгахаюни
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: мараӈгахаюниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: мараӈгахаюни
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: мараӈгахаюниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: мараӈгахаюни
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: мараӈгыниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: мараӈгыни
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: мараӈгыниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: мараӈгыни
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: мараӈгыˮниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: мараӈгыˮни
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: мараӈгахаˮниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: мараӈгахаˮни
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: мараӈгахаˮнаниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: мараӈгахаˮнани
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: мараӈгахатаниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: мараӈгахатани
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: мараӈгыˮмнаниʼ
#     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: мараӈгыˮмнани
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: мараӈгариʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: мараӈгамдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: мараӈгандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: мараӈгахандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: мараӈгаханандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: мараӈгахадандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: мараӈгавнандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: мараӈгахаютиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: мараӈгыдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: мараӈгыдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: мараӈгытиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: мараӈгахатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: мараӈгахаˮнатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: мараӈгахататиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: мараӈгыˮмнатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: мараӈгадиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: мараӈгамдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: мараӈгандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: мараӈгахандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: мараӈгаханандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: мараӈгахадандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: мараӈгавнандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: мараӈгахаютиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: мараӈгыдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: мараӈгыдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: мараӈгытиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: мараӈгахатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: мараӈгахаˮнатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: мараӈгахататиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: мараӈгыˮмнатиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: мараӈгаваˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: мараӈгаваˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: мараӈганаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: мараӈгаханаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: мараӈгахананаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: мараӈгахаданаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: мараӈгавнанаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: мараӈгахаюнаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: мараӈгахаюнаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: мараӈгахаюнаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: мараӈгынаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: мараӈгынаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: мараӈгыˮнаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: мараӈгахаˮнаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: мараӈгахаˮнанаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: мараӈгахатанаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: мараӈгыˮмнанаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: мараӈгараˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мараӈгамдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мараӈгандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: мараӈгахандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: мараӈгаханандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: мараӈгахадандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: мараӈгавнандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: мараӈгахаюдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: мараӈгахаюдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: мараӈгахаютаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: мараӈгыдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: мараӈгыдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: мараӈгытаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: мараӈгахатаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: мараӈгахаˮнатаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: мараӈгахататаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: мараӈгыˮмнатаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: мараӈгадоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мараӈгамдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: мараӈгандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: мараӈгахандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: мараӈгаханандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: мараӈгахадандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: мараӈгавнандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: мараӈгахаюдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: мараӈгахаюдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: мараӈгахаютоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: мараӈгыдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: мараӈгыдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: мараӈгытоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: мараӈгахатоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: мараӈгахаˮнатоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: мараӈгахататоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: мараӈгыˮмнатоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Abs: мараӈгад
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [мараӈгадав, мараӈгадув, мараӈгадами, мараӈгадми]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [мараӈгадав, мараӈгадув, мараӈгадами, мараӈгадми]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [мараӈгадан, мараӈгадани, мараӈгадни]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: мараӈгадар
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: мараӈгадамд
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: мараӈгаданд
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [мараӈгадада, мараӈгадда]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: мараӈгадамда
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: мараӈгаданда
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [мараӈгадамиʼ, мараӈгадмиʼ]
#     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [мараӈгадами, мараӈгадми]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [мараӈгадамиʼ, мараӈгадмиʼ]
#     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [мараӈгадами, мараӈгадми]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [мараӈгаданиʼ, мараӈгадниʼ]
#     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [мараӈгадани, мараӈгадни]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [мараӈгадариʼ, мараӈгадриʼ]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: мараӈгадамдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: мараӈгадандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [мараӈгададиʼ, мараӈгаддиʼ]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: мараӈгадамдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: мараӈгадандиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [мараӈгадаваˮ, мараӈгадваˮ]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [мараӈгадаваˮ, мараӈгадваˮ]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [мараӈгаданаˮ, мараӈгаднаˮ]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [мараӈгадараˮ, мараӈгадраˮ]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: мараӈгадамдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: мараӈгадандаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [мараӈгададоʼ, мараӈгаддоʼ]
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: мараӈгадамдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: мараӈгадандоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мараӈгадмʼ
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: мараӈган
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈга
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: мараӈганиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мараӈгадиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаʼ
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: мараӈгаваˮ
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мараӈгадаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: мараӈгадамзь
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: мараӈганась
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгась
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: мараӈганинзь
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: мараӈгадинзь
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгаханзь
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: мараӈгаваць
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: мараӈгадаць
     мараӈга+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгаць
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈгав
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈгар
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈгада
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈгамиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈгариʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈгадиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈгаваˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈгараˮ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараӈгадоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгавась
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгарась
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгадась
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгаминзь
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгаринзь
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгадинзь
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгаваць
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгараць
     мараӈга+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараӈгадонзь
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюн
